Connecticut, session 2026, SB00109.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
five million dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the
Department of Energy and Environmental Protection for the purpose of
providing a grant-in-aid to rehabilitate and upgrade the utilities,
including, but not limited to, the sewer and water lines and other
equipment such as pump stations, associated with connecting Norwich
Public Works through the former Norwich State Hospital property in
the towns of Norwich and Preston and extending to the Preston
Incinerator site in the town of Preston.
LCO No. 797 1 of 2

Proposed Bill No. 109